Utah statutes.
17-27a-503.   Land use ordinance or zoning map amendments.

(1)  The legislative body may amend:

(a)  the number, shape, boundaries, or area of any zoning district;

(b)  any regulation of or within the zoning district; or

(c)  any other provision of a land use ordinance.

(2)  The legislative body may not make any amendment authorized by this subsection unless the amendment was proposed by the planning commission or is first submitted to the planning commission for its recommendation.

(3)  The legislative body shall comply with the procedure specified in Section 17-27a-502 in preparing and adopting an amendment to a land use ordinance or a zoning map.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 254, 2005 General Session

